lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3215 Y 1
SFX 3215 0 power's .
SFX 1983 Y 1
SFX 1983 0 erner .
SFX 2402 Y 1
SFX 2402 0 ng's .
SFX 1001 Y 1
SFX 1001 0 offs .
SFX 2110 Y 1
SFX 2110 0 rly .
SFX 3535 Y 1
SFX 3535 0 body's .
SFX 3170 Y 1
SFX 3170 0 rns .
SFX 1850 Y 1
SFX 1850 0 suit .
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 0 less .
SFX 664 Y 1
SFX 664 0 lest .
SFX 2346 Y 1
SFX 2346 0 setting .
SFX 4655 Y 1
SFX 4655 0 rry .
SFX 2352 Y 1
SFX 2352 0 rts .
SFX 1200 Y 1
SFX 1200 0 sie's .
SFX 2442 Y 1
SFX 2442 0 leys .
SFX 1631 Y 1
SFX 1631 0 zing .
SFX 4845 Y 1
SFX 4845 0 ntal .
SFX 2249 Y 1
SFX 2249 0 case's .
SFX 2283 Y 1
SFX 2283 0 writing .
SFX 1896 Y 1
SFX 1896 0 nted .
SFX 4844 Y 1
SFX 4844 0 nter .
SFX 732 Y 1
SFX 732 0 ser's .
SFX 1372 Y 1
SFX 1372 0 ti's .
SFX 2624 Y 1
SFX 2624 0 uality .
SFX 3083 Y 1
SFX 3083 0 tine's .
SFX 4184 Y 1
SFX 4184 0 es's .
SFX 3932 Y 1
SFX 3932 0 nah's .
SFX 3013 Y 1
SFX 3013 0 -eightfold .
SFX 2924 Y 1
SFX 2924 0 elessness .
SFX 4432 Y 1
SFX 4432 0 ualize .
SFX 4838 Y 1
SFX 4838 0 nton .
SFX 2205 Y 1
SFX 2205 0 ibles .
SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 0 t's .
SFX 2850 Y 1
SFX 2850 0 inate .
SFX 3845 Y 1
SFX 3845 0 pected .
SFX 3563 Y 1
SFX 3563 0 acies .
SFX 1343 Y 1
SFX 1343 0 de's .
SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95 0 ised .
SFX 265 Y 1
SFX 265 0 iser .
SFX 92 Y 1
SFX 92 0 ises .
SFX 1778 Y 1
SFX 1778 0 ena's .
SFX 2835 Y 1
SFX 2835 0 iveness' .
SFX 2776 Y 1
SFX 2776 0 ningly .
SFX 3034 Y 1
SFX 3034 0 vention .
SFX 2191 Y 1
SFX 2191 0 isher's .
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 0 head .
SFX 1608 Y 1
SFX 1608 0 eds .
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 0 edly .
SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79 0 isms .
SFX 2598 Y 1
SFX 2598 0 weeds .
SFX 1342 Y 1
SFX 1342 0 dered .
SFX 4231 Y 1
SFX 4231 0 derer .
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 0 etting .
SFX 1858 Y 1
SFX 1858 0 shed .
SFX 4609 Y 1
SFX 4609 0 sher .
SFX 2682 Y 1
SFX 2682 0 shes .
SFX 3765 Y 1
SFX 3765 0 sawing .
SFX 1809 Y 1
SFX 1809 0 ablenesses .
SFX 3354 Y 1
SFX 3354 0 issa .
SFX 3009 Y 1
SFX 3009 0 -fifths .
SFX 2236 Y 1
SFX 2236 0 ela .
SFX 2001 Y 1
SFX 2001 0 ele .
SFX 3477 Y 1
SFX 3477 0 elf .
SFX 648 Y 1
SFX 648 0 ell .
SFX 363 Y 1
SFX 363 0 els .
SFX 1965 Y 1
SFX 1965 0 horn's .
SFX 513 Y 1
SFX 513 0 ely .
SFX 1485 Y 1
SFX 1485 0 ena .
SFX 1020 Y 1
SFX 1020 0 end .
SFX 967 Y 1
SFX 967 0 ene .
SFX 150 Y 1
SFX 150 0 ship .
SFX 514 Y 1
SFX 514 0 wards .
SFX 224 Y 1
SFX 224 0 ens .
SFX 324 Y 1
SFX 324 0 ent .
SFX 1489 Y 1
SFX 1489 0 diest .
SFX 1601 Y 1
SFX 1601 0 era .
SFX 787 Y 1
SFX 787 0 ern .
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 0 ers .
SFX 1335 Y 1
SFX 1335 0 ert .
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 0 ery .
SFX 4241 Y 1
SFX 4241 0 cribed .
SFX 4240 Y 1
SFX 4240 0 cribes .
SFX 3454 Y 1
SFX 3454 0 eta .
SFX 4602 Y 1
SFX 4602 0 shoe .
SFX 3452 Y 1
SFX 3452 0 eth .
SFX 2103 Y 1
SFX 2103 0 shop .
SFX 197 Y 1
SFX 197 0 ets .
SFX 1772 Y 1
SFX 1772 0 ett .
SFX 1293 Y 1
SFX 1293 0 shot .
SFX 1512 Y 1
SFX 1512 0 workers .
SFX 2880 Y 1
SFX 2880 0 hest .
SFX 3661 Y 1
SFX 3661 0 tized .
SFX 3660 Y 1
SFX 3660 0 tizes .
SFX 4863 Y 1
SFX 4863 0 nishing .
SFX 2274 Y 1
SFX 2274 0 abouts .
SFX 2540 Y 1
SFX 2540 0 drop .
SFX 848 Y 1
SFX 848 0 ius's .
SFX 3094 Y 1
SFX 3094 0 tfully .
SFX 4873 Y 1
SFX 4873 0 nged .
SFX 4173 Y 1
SFX 4173 0 etries .
SFX 4872 Y 1
SFX 4872 0 nger .
SFX 4183 Y 1
SFX 4183 0 escence .
SFX 1199 Y 1
SFX 1199 0 someness .
SFX 1186 Y 1
SFX 1186 0 ving .
SFX 3238 Y 1
SFX 3238 0 orter's .
SFX 257 Y 1
SFX 257 0 izers .
SFX 4071 Y 1
SFX 4071 0 ionalism .
SFX 2576 Y 1
SFX 2576 0 about's .
SFX 3282 Y 1
SFX 3282 0 nations .
SFX 576 Y 1
SFX 576 0 ite's .
SFX 964 Y 1
SFX 964 0 hearted .
SFX 4743 Y 1
SFX 4743 0 pointing .
SFX 2034 Y 1
SFX 2034 0 as's .
SFX 3499 Y 1
SFX 3499 0 ctors .
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 0 g's .
SFX 4493 Y 1
SFX 4493 0 tial .
SFX 2647 Y 1
SFX 2647 0 tian .
SFX 4461 Y 1
SFX 4461 0 track .
SFX 4460 Y 1
SFX 4460 0 tract .
SFX 1969 Y 1
SFX 1969 0 hering .
SFX 1524 Y 1
SFX 1524 0 tick .
SFX 586 Y 1
SFX 586 0 tics .
SFX 3670 Y 1
SFX 3670 0 tied .
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 0 tier .
SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301 0 ties .
SFX 3448 Y 1
SFX 3448 0 fers .
SFX 3381 Y 1
SFX 3381 0 ida's .
SFX 2523 Y 1
SFX 2523 0 eses .
SFX 4910 Y 1
SFX 4910 0 mund .
SFX 886 Y 1
SFX 886 0 siest .
SFX 2387 Y 1
SFX 2387 0 ometers .
SFX 1051 Y 1
SFX 1051 0 tal .
SFX 1376 Y 1
SFX 1376 0 tan .
SFX 3111 Y 1
SFX 3111 0 tar .
SFX 3110 Y 1
SFX 3110 0 tas .
SFX 585 Y 1
SFX 585 0 time .
SFX 3363 Y 1
SFX 3363 0 inating .
SFX 2259 Y 1
SFX 2259 0 ancy's .
SFX 436 Y 1
SFX 436 0 tion .
SFX 57 Y 1
SFX 57 0 ted .
SFX 3102 Y 1
SFX 3102 0 tee .
SFX 2327 Y 1
SFX 2327 0 tel .
SFX 605 Y 1
SFX 605 0 ten .
SFX 2656 Y 1
SFX 2656 0 tep .
SFX 82 Y 1
SFX 82 0 ter .
SFX 259 Y 1
SFX 259 0 tes .
SFX 2060 Y 1
SFX 2060 0 uting .
SFX 2578 Y 1
SFX 2578 0 -third .
SFX 4480 Y 1
SFX 4480 0 tise .
SFX 3075 Y 1
SFX 3075 0 tish .
SFX 2077 Y 1
SFX 2077 0 tist .
SFX 408 Y 1
SFX 408 0 tic .
SFX 804 Y 1
SFX 804 0 tie .
SFX 769 Y 1
SFX 769 0 tiness .
SFX 2318 Y 1
SFX 2318 0 tin .
SFX 3077 Y 1
SFX 3077 0 tis .
SFX 1721 Y 1
SFX 1721 0 list's .
SFX 2299 Y 1
SFX 2299 0 uously .
SFX 146 Y 1
SFX 146 0 ton .
SFX 876 Y 1
SFX 876 0 top .
SFX 604 Y 1
SFX 604 0 tor .
SFX 2637 Y 1
SFX 2637 0 tos .
SFX 679 Y 1
SFX 679 0 times .
SFX 3861 Y 1
SFX 3861 0 orizations .
SFX 4694 Y 1
SFX 4694 0 rida .
SFX 4692 Y 1
SFX 4692 0 ride .
SFX 1421 Y 1
SFX 1421 0 ography .
SFX 1037 Y 1
SFX 1037 0 -offs .
SFX 1340 Y 1
SFX 1340 0 dest .
SFX 1304 Y 1
SFX 1304 0 omely .
SFX 3698 Y 1
SFX 3698 0 tailing .
SFX 4301 Y 1
SFX 4301 0 anism's .
SFX 173 Y 1
SFX 173 0 ively .
SFX 3176 Y 1
SFX 3176 0 rily .
SFX 1869 Y 1
SFX 1869 0 rina .
SFX 1867 Y 1
SFX 1867 0 rine .
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 0 ring .
SFX 1011 Y 1
SFX 1011 0 making .
SFX 1618 Y 1
SFX 1618 0 cake's .
SFX 671 Y 1
SFX 671 0 ful's .
SFX 1803 Y 1
SFX 1803 0 beds .
SFX 588 Y 1
SFX 588 0 ney's .
SFX 1997 Y 1
SFX 1997 0 ellers .
SFX 3989 Y 1
SFX 3989 0 lisers .
SFX 672 Y 1
SFX 672 0 ence's .
SFX 4676 Y 1
SFX 4676 0 rite .
SFX 4920 Y 1
SFX 4920 0 mistress's .
SFX 1149 Y 1
SFX 1149 0 li's .
SFX 1727 Y 1
SFX 1727 0 leigh .
SFX 1653 Y 1
SFX 1653 0 terers .
SFX 4697 Y 1
SFX 4697 0 rian's .
SFX 2553 Y 1
SFX 2553 0 bell .
SFX 4411 Y 1
SFX 4411 0 ularizations .
SFX 4278 Y 1
SFX 4278 0 belt .
SFX 3795 Y 1
SFX 3795 0 rize .
SFX 1946 Y 1
SFX 1946 0 inations .
SFX 4687 Y 1
SFX 4687 0 rin's .
SFX 4749 Y 1
SFX 4749 0 pick .
SFX 1741 Y 1
SFX 1741 0 ility's .
SFX 2926 Y 1
SFX 2926 0 ectively .
SFX 659 Y 1
SFX 659 0 sy's .
SFX 2770 Y 1
SFX 2770 0 non's .
SFX 610 Y 1
SFX 610 0 pier .
SFX 1134 Y 1
SFX 1134 0 pies .
SFX 3147 Y 1
SFX 3147 0 shot's .
SFX 976 Y 1
SFX 976 0 berg .
SFX 4147 Y 1
SFX 4147 0 gan .
SFX 693 Y 1
SFX 693 0 bers .
SFX 2956 Y 1
SFX 2956 0 bert .
SFX 2954 Y 1
SFX 2954 0 bery .
SFX 2669 Y 1
SFX 2669 0 states .
SFX 3489 Y 1
SFX 3489 0 drop's .
SFX 2952 Y 1
SFX 2952 0 beth .
SFX 4001 Y 1
SFX 4001 0 licate .
SFX 2558 Y 1
SFX 2558 0 ases .
SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131 0 ged .
SFX 3429 Y 1
SFX 3429 0 gen .
SFX 276 Y 1
SFX 276 0 ger .
SFX 549 Y 1
SFX 549 0 ges .
SFX 2893 Y 1
SFX 2893 0 get .
SFX 3710 Y 1
SFX 3710 0 static .
SFX 2015 Y 1
SFX 2015 0 coats .
SFX 4249 Y 1
SFX 4249 0 cia's .
SFX 4334 Y 1
SFX 4334 0 -end .
SFX 1478 Y 1
SFX 1478 0 gie .
SFX 4349 Y 1
SFX 4349 0 wrights .
SFX 4039 Y 1
SFX 4039 0 izingly .
SFX 3000 Y 1
SFX 3000 0 -head .
SFX 4359 Y 1
SFX 4359 0 watch .
SFX 3131 Y 1
SFX 3131 0 ssing .
SFX 2003 Y 1
SFX 2003 0 eful .
SFX 2552 Y 1
SFX 2552 0 bella's .
SFX 4745 Y 1
SFX 4745 0 pish .
SFX 4140 Y 1
SFX 4140 0 gon .
SFX 765 Y 1
SFX 765 0 water .
SFX 3417 Y 1
SFX 3417 0 gos .
SFX 2866 Y 1
SFX 2866 0 icle's .
SFX 2464 Y 1
SFX 2464 0 ionism .
SFX 852 Y 1
SFX 852 0 ionist .
SFX 1133 Y 1
SFX 1133 0 points .
SFX 4346 Y 1
SFX 4346 0 writing's .
SFX 3413 Y 1
SFX 3413 0 gun .
SFX 3962 Y 1
SFX 3962 0 mable .
SFX 1714 Y 1
SFX 1714 0 makings .
SFX 3582 Y 1
SFX 3582 0 wing's .
SFX 3570 Y 1
SFX 3570 0 -faced .
SFX 4975 Y 1
SFX 4975 0 listic .
SFX 1905 Y 1
SFX 1905 0 nel's .
SFX 3085 Y 1
SFX 3085 0 tics's .
SFX 1419 Y 1
SFX 1419 0 omeness .
SFX 480 Y 1
SFX 480 0 ess's .
SFX 151 Y 1
SFX 151 0 ning .
SFX 4441 Y 1
SFX 4441 0 tz's .
SFX 4087 Y 1
SFX 4087 0 ight's .
SFX 1730 Y 1
SFX 1730 0 kie's .
