lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Goldi/1,16,21,30,33,111,120,421,1069,2402
Kit/1,97,157,261,804,832,1372,4451
Leon/630,689,690,713,1417,2350,2383,2863,3083
Sta/1,13,15,27,28,40,71,193,225,292,294,346,385,436,490,531,593,605,751,972,987,1003,1167,1255,1370,1845,2315,2438,2939,2940,3513,3514,4249,4250,4253,4838,4872
Susan/1,27,30,33,40,111,117,120,138,858,859,3932,3933
cave/1,2,6,13,15,19,69,78,90,96,112,122,130,154,161,1038,1180,2556,2557,2708,3170,4662,4665
clean/2,3,4,5,9,10,11,12,14,17,29,32,35,38,186,209,232,238,258,269,270,280,293,303,359,407,474,485,527,540,732,981,1202,3796,3812,4527,4706
east/1,2,3,9,32,416,514,598,787,1029,1983,2527,2913,3463
every/1652,1881,3535
evil/2,5,9,10,11,17,38,121,664,1558,2408,4897,4899
flu/1,2,8,16,21,48,57,82,119,147,157,200,220,231,237,259,310,324,357,421,482,487,511,516,525,582,658,845,888,900,908,957,1021,1028,1183,1230,1337,1431,1484,1561,1814,1858,2075,2076,2077,2682,3148,3338,4604,4609,4653,4655
left-hand/9,12,14,169,198
noise/1,2,6,7,50,132,144,164,172,196,246,336,411,459,547,572,684,811,1011,2426,2582,2997
pap/1,2,9,12,14,25,28,30,33,59,67,73,83,109,113,152,156,194,277,466,481,609,610,752,860,1134,1482,1503,1804,1948,2202,2257,2914,3561,3562,3563
pea/1,2,13,15,19,26,46,49,52,63,97,107,140,157,160,174,200,220,227,292,298,373,385,450,461,472,493,506,511,863,1257,1258,1792,1795,1894,1895,1932,2013,2014,2020,2021,2110,2449,2768,4601,4669
place/1,2,6,7,13,15,19,35,41,42,44,50,90,96,172,963,1163,1497,1744,1745,1954,1955,2949,4096,4097,4268,4845
poss/667,802,855,925,1088,1114,1328,2205
public/1,2,5,10,11,45,58,59,64,67,73,80,85,86,87,89,91,92,95,98,102,104,124,217,278,3750
sens/3,4,8,16,21,89,100,102,104,105,118,142,431,661,667,803,855,927,1088,1245,1328,1352,2064,2205,2298,2299,2623,2624,2837,2924,3053,3344,3396,3478,3479,4054,4055,4116,4435,4440
sixty/155,2577,2578,2579,2580,2978,2979,2980,2981,2982,2983,2984,2985,2986,2987,2988,2989,2990,2991,2992,2993,2994,2995,3001,3002,3003,3004,3005,3006,3007,3008,3009,3010,3011,3012,3013
ski/1,2,3,4,6,8,9,12,14,26,27,29,32,35,40,48,57,63,71,83,97,145,283,285,290,331,453,454,467,476,864,1012,1145,1186,1395,1515,1811,1908,2352,2353,3213,3774,3775,3776,3831,4649,4853,4962,4981
sky/1,3,50,189,219,287,304,379,416,430,514,639,663,779,1495,1797,1816,1817,2024,2225,2283,2591,3158,3762,4346,4358
stat/1,2,9,12,43,148,183,254,267,291,320,342,353,449,561,602,633,641,656,1018,1077,1245,1358,1517,1640,1646,1647,1734,2194,2302,2465,2466,2539,2617,2924,3474,3478,4207,4427,4428,4429
suit/1,2,3,4,8,14,16,21,29,32,35,100,105,118,186,206,299,502,1617,1796,1809,2249
super/69,78,90,112,340,341,378,462,582,1201,1294,1852,2347,2371,2374,2548,2608,2669,2731,2732,2938,3033,3034,3214,3215,3216,3217,3218,3219,3510,3618,3759,3760,4021,4068,4371,4372,4547,4548,4577,4623,4629,4630,4631
tau/1,2,683,1690,1896,2150,2736,3228,4844
term/1,2,3,4,5,8,9,12,47,423,575,576,1495,1509,1946,1947,2201,2850,3360,3363,3364,3365,4866,4879
test/1,2,3,4,8,9,12,14,18,29,34,35,36,56,74,129,142,186,190,191,221,376,458,594,620,621,622,796,824,866,1087,1239,1466,1803,2481,2865,2866,2867,2970,2971,2972,3524,4184
thermo/2346,2371,3292,3435,3436,3712,3889
toot/380,659,934,1056,1200
tor/1,2,8,13,16,26,27,41,42,63,75,97,106,147,183,209,259,267,298,310,373,461,472,493,602,605,1211,1279,1291,1292,1369,1387,1682,1702,2147,2368,2422,2626,2674,2721,2798,3064,3188,3726,3881,4599,4707,4733
track/1,2,3,4,12,14,50,167,172,221,629,694,1850,2088,3703
trio/1,2,1343,2541
turn/2,3,4,9,12,14,29,32,35,258,332,388,463,485,507,529,612,632,635,738,809,998,1001,1037,1270,1552,1933,2015,2016,2045,2184,2274,2543,2576,2581,3699,4030
verb/1,2,1485,1778,1889
vis/1,3,4,8,16,21,30,33,55,60,62,99,100,105,118,167,185,194,195,230,263,431,561,617,641,667,742,764,773,803,855,895,927,1088,1317,1318,1328,2466,2622,2842,2843,3110,3345,3396,3642,3643,4431,4432,4433,4434,4436,4437,4438,4439,4440
vol/2,3,4,8,16,21,26,63,97,140,147,294,346,484,524,1230,1517,1528,1640,1849,1937,2187,2300,2442,2456,2613,2614,2615,2664
whee/2,792,912,970,971,1108,1173,1631,1632,1812,1873,2120,3015,3193,3493,4338,4901
